test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-póósa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - póósa - ok : # -m animate noun, dog AEW NA1
     póósa+NA+Sg: póósa
     póósa+NA+Pl: póósiksi
     póósa+NA+Obv: póósi
     póósa+NA+Non: póósi
     
     póósa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nitohpóósima
     póósa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nitohpóósimiksi
     póósa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nitohpóósimi
     póósa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nitohpóósimi
     
     póósa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nitohpóósiminnaana
     póósa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nitohpóósiminnaaniksi
     póósa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nitohpóósiminnaani
     póósa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nitohpóósiminnaani

     póósa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kitohpóósiminnoona
     póósa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kitohpóósiminnooniksi
     póósa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kitohpóósiminnooni
     póósa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kitohpóósiminnooni

     póósa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kitohpóósima
     póósa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kitohpóósimiksi
     póósa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kitohpóósimi
     póósa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kitohpóósimi

     póósa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kitohpóósimoaawa
     póósa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kitohpóósimoaawaiksi
     póósa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kitohpóósimoaawayi
     póósa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kitohpóósimoaawai

     póósa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: otohpóósimiksi
     póósa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: otohpóósimi
     póósa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: otohpóósimi

     póósa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: otohpóósimoaawaiksi
     póósa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: otohpóósimoaawayi
     póósa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: otohpóósimoaawai
